src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-verbs_gt-norm.yaml
    herða+V+Inf: herða
    herða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: herdur
    herða+V+Sup: hert
    hevna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hevnir
    hevna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hevndu
    hevna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hevndi
    hevna+V+Inf: hevna
    hevna+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hevndur
    hevna+V+Sup: hevnt
    hitta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hittir
    hitta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hittu
    hitta+V+Inf: hitta
    hitta+V+Sup: hitt
    hjálpa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hjálpir
    hjálpa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hjálptu
    hjálpa+V+Inf: hjálpa
    hjálpa+V+Sup: hjálpt
    holva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: holvir
    holva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: holvdu
    holva+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: holvdi
    holva+V+Inf: holva
    holva+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: holvdur
    holva+V+Sup: holvt
    horva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: horvir
    horva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: horvdu
    horva+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: horvdi
    horva+V+Inf: horva
    horva+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: horvdur
    horva+V+Sup: horvt
    hoyra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hoyrir
    hoyra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hoyrdu
    hoyra+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hoyrdi
    hoyra+V+Inf: hoyra
    hoyra+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hoyrdur
    hoyra+V+Sup: hoyrt
    hugfesta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hugfestir
    hugfesta+V+Inf: hugfesta
    hugfesta+V+Sup: hugfest
    hugleiða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hugleiðir
    hugleiða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hugleiddu
    hugleiða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hugleiddi
    hugleiða+V+Inf: hugleiða
    hugleiða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hugleiddur
    hugleiða+V+Sup: hugleitt
    huglyfta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: huglyftir
    huglyfta+V+Inf: huglyfta
    huglyfta+V+Sup: huglyft
    hugsæra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hugsærir
    hugsæra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hugsærdu
    hugsæra+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hugsærdi
    hugsæra+V+Inf: hugsæra
    hugsæra+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hugsærdur
    hugsæra+V+Sup: hugsært
    hugtøla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hugtølir
    hugtøla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hugtøldu
    hugtøla+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hugtøldi
    hugtøla+V+Inf: hugtøla
    hugtøla+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hugtøldur
    hugtøla+V+Sup: hugtølt
    hugvilla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hugvillir
    hugvilla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hugviltu
    hugvilla+V+Inf: hugvilla
    hugvilla+V+Sup: hugvilt
    hundbeita+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hundbeitir
    hundbeita+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hundbeittu
    hundbeita+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hundbeitti
    hundbeita+V+Inf: hundbeita
    hundbeita+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hundbeittur
    hundbeita+V+Sup: hundbeitt
    hundræða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hundræðir
    hundræða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hundræddu
    hundræða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hundræddi
    hundræða+V+Inf: hundræða
    hundræða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hundræddur
    hundræða+V+Sup: hundrætt
    hveppa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hveppir
    hveppa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hveptu
    hveppa+V+Inf: hveppa
    hveppa+V+Sup: hvept
    hválva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hválvir
    hválva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hválvdu
    hválva+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hválvdi
    hválva+V+Inf: hválva
    hválva+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hválvdur
    hválva+V+Sup: hválvt
    hvæsa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hvæsir
    hvæsa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hvæstu
    hvæsa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hvæsti
    hvæsa+V+Inf: hvæsa
    hvæsa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hvæstur
    hvæsa+V+Sup: hvæst
    hvíla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hvílir
    hvíla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hvíldu
    hvíla+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hvíldi
    hvíla+V+Inf: hvíla
    hvíla+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hvíldur
    hvíla+V+Sup: hvílt
    hvína+V+Inf: hvína
    hvíta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hvítir
    hvíta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hvíttu
    hvíta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hvítti
    hvíta+V+Inf: hvíta
    hvíta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hvíttur
    hvíta+V+Sup: hvítt
    hvølva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hvølvir
    hvølva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hvølvdu
    hvølva+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hvølvdi
    hvølva+V+Inf: hvølva
    hvølva+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hvølvdur
    hvølva+V+Sup: hvølvt
    hvøppa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hvøppir
    hvøppa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hvøptu
    hvøppa+V+Inf: hvøppa
    hvøppa+V+Sup: hvøpt
    hvørva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [hvørvur, hvarv]
    hvørva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hvurvu
    hvørva+V+Inf: hvørva
    hvørva+V+Sup: [horvið, hvorvið]
    hylla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hyllir
    hylla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hyltu
    hylla+V+Inf: hylla
    hylla+V+Sup: hylt
    hálsfevna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hálsfevnir
    hálsfevna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hálsfevndu
    hálsfevna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hálsfevndi
    hálsfevna+V+Inf: hálsfevna
    hálsfevna+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hálsfevndur
    hálsfevna+V+Sup: hálsfevnt
    hámeta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hámetir
    hámeta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hámettu
    hámeta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hámetti
    hámeta+V+Inf: hámeta
    hámeta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hámettur
    hámeta+V+Sup: hámett
    hárroyta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hárroytir
    hárroyta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hárroyttu
    hárroyta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hárroytti
    hárroyta+V+Inf: hárroyta
    hárroyta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hárroyttur
    hárroyta+V+Sup: hárroytt
    hávirða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hávirðir
    hávirða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hávirdu
    hávirða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hávirdi
    hávirða+V+Inf: hávirða
    hávirða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hávirdur
    hávirða+V+Sup: hávirt
    háðflenna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: háðflennir
    háðflenna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: háðflentu
    háðflenna+V+Inf: háðflenna
    háðflenna+V+Sup: háðflent
    hæra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hærir
    hæra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hærdu
    hæra+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hærdi
    hæra+V+Inf: hæra
    hæra+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hærdur
    hæra+V+Sup: hært
    hæsa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [hæsar, hæsir]
    hæsa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [hæsaðu, hæstu]
    hæsa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [hæsaði, hæsti]
    hæsa+V+Inf: hæsa
    hæsa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [hæsaður, hæstur]
    hæsa+V+Sup: [hæsað, hæst]
    hætta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [hættar, hættir]
    hætta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [hættaðu, hættu]
    hætta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hættaði
    hætta+V+Inf: hætta
    hætta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hættaður
    hætta+V+Sup: [hætt, hættað]
    hæða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hæðir
    hæða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hæddu
    hæða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hæddi
    hæða+V+Inf: hæða
    hæða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hæddur
    hæða+V+Sup: hætt
    híma+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [hímar, hímir]
    híma+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [hímaðu, hímdu]
    híma+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [hímaði, hímdi]
    híma+V+Inf: híma
    híma+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [hímaður, hímdur]
    híma+V+Sup: [hímað, hímt]
    hótta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [hóttar, hóttir]
    hótta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [hóttaðu, hóttu]
    hótta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hóttaði
    hótta+V+Inf: hótta
    hótta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hóttaður
    hótta+V+Sup: [hótt, hóttað]
    høla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hølir
    høla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: høldu
    høla+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: høldi
    høla+V+Inf: høla
    høla+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: høldur
    høla+V+Sup: hølt
    høva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: høvir
    høva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: høvdu
    høva+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: høvdi
    høva+V+Inf: høva
    høva+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: høvdur
    høva+V+Sup: høvt
    húðfletta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: húðflettir
    húðfletta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: húðflettu
    húðfletta+V+Inf: húðfletta
    húðfletta+V+Sup: húðflett
    hýsa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: hýsir
    hýsa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: hýstu
    hýsa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: hýsti
    hýsa+V+Inf: hýsa
    hýsa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: hýstur
    hýsa+V+Sup: hýst
    illflenna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: illflennir
    illflenna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: illflentu
    illflenna+V+Inf: illflenna
    illflenna+V+Sup: illflent
    illgita+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: illgitir
    illgita+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: illgittu
    illgita+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: illgitti
    illgita+V+Inf: illgita
    illgita+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: illgittur
    illgita+V+Sup: illgitt
    illkenna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: illkennir
    illkenna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: illkendu
    illkenna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: illkendi
    illkenna+V+Inf: illkenna
    illkenna+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: illkendur
    illkenna+V+Sup: illkent
    innannøra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: innannørir
    innannøra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: innannørdu
    innannøra+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: innannørdi
    innannøra+V+Inf: innannøra
    innannøra+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: innannørdur
    innannøra+V+Sup: innannørt
    javnføra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: javnførir
    javnføra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: javnførdu
    javnføra+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: javnførdi
    javnføra+V+Inf: javnføra
    javnføra+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: javnførdur
    javnføra+V+Sup: javnført
    javnmeta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: javnmetir
    javnmeta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: javnmettu
    javnmeta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: javnmetti
    javnmeta+V+Inf: javnmeta
    javnmeta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: javnmettur
    javnmeta+V+Sup: javnmett
    javnsýna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: javnsýnir
    javnsýna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: javnsýndu
    javnsýna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: javnsýndi
    javnsýna+V+Inf: javnsýna
    javnsýna+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: javnsýndur
    javnsýna+V+Sup: javnsýnt
    kala+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kalir
    kala+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: kaldu
    kala+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: kaldi
    kala+V+Inf: kala
    kala+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: kaldur
    kala+V+Sup: kalt
    kalla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kallar
    kalla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: kallaðu
    kalla+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: kallaði
    kalla+V+Inf: kalla
    kalla+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: kallaður
    kalla+V+Sup: kallað
    kappfletta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kappflettir
    kappfletta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: kappflettu
    kappfletta+V+Inf: kappfletta
    kappfletta+V+Sup: kappflett
    kappgita+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kappgitir
    kappgita+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: kappgittu
    kappgita+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: kappgitti
    kappgita+V+Inf: kappgita
    kappgita+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: kappgittur
    kappgita+V+Sup: kappgitt
    kappkoyra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kappkoyrir
    kappkoyra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: kappkoyrdu
    kappkoyra+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: kappkoyrdi
    kappkoyra+V+Inf: kappkoyra
    kappkoyra+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: kappkoyrdur
    kappkoyra+V+Sup: kappkoyrt
    kapprøða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kapprøðir
    kapprøða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: kapprøddu
    kapprøða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: kapprøddi
    kapprøða+V+Inf: kapprøða
    kapprøða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: kapprøddur
    kapprøða+V+Sup: kapprøtt
    kappsigla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kappsiglir
    kappsigla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: kappsigldu
    kappsigla+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: kappsigldi
    kappsigla+V+Inf: kappsigla
    kappsigla+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: kappsigldur
    kappsigla+V+Sup: kappsiglt
    kappstoyta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kappstoytir
    kappstoyta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: kappstoyttu
    kappstoyta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: kappstoytti
    kappstoyta+V+Inf: kappstoyta
    kappstoyta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: kappstoyttur
    kappstoyta+V+Sup: kappstoytt
    kapptelva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [kapptelvar, kapptelvir]
    kapptelva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [kapptelvaðu, kapptelvdu]
    kapptelva+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: [kapptelvaði, kapptelvdi]
    kapptelva+V+Inf: kapptelva
    kapptelva+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: [kapptelvaður, kapptelvdur]
    kapptelva+V+Sup: [kapptelvað, kapptelvt]
    kappvelta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kappveltir
    kappvelta+V+Inf: kappvelta
    kappvelta+V+Sup: kappvelt
    kavstoyta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kavstoytir
    kavstoyta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: kavstoyttu
    kavstoyta+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: kavstoytti
    kavstoyta+V+Inf: kavstoyta
    kavstoyta+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: kavstoyttur
    kavstoyta+V+Sup: kavstoytt
    kelka+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kelkir
    kelka+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: kelktu
    kelka+V+Inf: kelka
    kelka+V+Sup: kelkt
    kelkja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kelkir
    kelkja+V+Inf: kelkja
    kelkja+V+Sup: kelkt
    kelva+V+Inf: kelva
    kemba+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kembir
    kemba+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: kembdu
    kemba+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: kembdi
    kemba+V+Inf: kemba
    kemba+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: kembdur
    kemba+V+Sup: kembt
    kenna+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kennir
    kenna+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: kendu
    kenna+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: kendi
    kenna+V+Inf: kenna
    kenna+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: kendur
    kenna+V+Sup: kent
    keypa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: keypir
    keypa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: keyptu
    keypa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: keypti
    keypa+V+Inf: keypa
    keypa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: keyptur
    keypa+V+Sup: keypt
    keða+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: keðir
    keða+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: keddu
    keða+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: keddi
    keða+V+Inf: keða
    keða+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: keddur
    keða+V+Sup: kett
    kippa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: [kippar, kippir]
    kippa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: [kippaðu, kiptu]
    kippa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: kippaði
    kippa+V+Inf: kippa
    kippa+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: kippaður
    kippa+V+Sup: [kippað, kipt]
    kirva+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kirvir
    kirva+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: kirvdu
    kirva+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: kirvdi
    kirva+V+Inf: kirva
    kirva+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: kirvdur
    kirva+V+Sup: kirvt
    kleima+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: kleimar
